Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.210

Admission of district pupils tuition free.

Every school district shall admit on a tuition free basis: (1) All persons of school age who reside within this state, and do not reside within another school district carrying the grades for which they are eligible to enroll: PROVIDED, That nothing in this subsection shall be construed as affecting RCW 28A.225.220 or 28A.225.250; and (2) all students who meet the definition of children of military families in transition under Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 who are in the care of a noncustodial parent or other person standing in loco parentis and who lives in another state while the parent is under military orders.

[ 2009 c 380 s 6; 1990 c 33 s 235; 1983 c 3 s 37; 1969 c 130 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.230. Prior: 1917 c 21 s 9; RRS s 4718. Formerly RCW 28A.58.230, 28.58.230.]

NOTES:

Designation of high school district nonhigh district students shall attend—Effect when attendance otherwise: RCW 28A.540.110.

Education of children with disabilities: RCW 28A.155.050.